Hawaii statutes.
§805-5 Warrant after summons issued.
The district judge may, for any cause which appears to the district judge to be
sufficient, at any time after the issue of the summons, and by virtue of the
complaint therein contained and recited, issue the district judge's warrant for
the immediate arrest, upon the charge, of the person so summoned. [L 1892, c
57, §21; RL 1925, §4010; RL 1935, §5473; RL 1945, §10773; RL 1955, §257-5; HRS
§710-5; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Obtaining the appearance of defendant, see HRPP rule 9.

Case Notes

Spelling of foreign names, reference in warrant to complaint
for names of persons to be arrested. 9 H. 641 (1895).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next